Wyoming, session 2025, HB0235.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-13-338 is created to read:
HB0235

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0685

21-13-338. Career and technical education supplies,
materials and equipment; criteria; limitations.

(a) Commencing with school year 2026-2027, to augment
amounts within the education resource block grant model
available to districts for career and technical education
programs, a school district may apply to the department of
education for career and technical education supplies,
materials and equipment funding in accordance with this
section. Application shall be on a form and in a manner
prescribed by the department.

(b) Each school district shall report the number of
full-time equivalent (FTE) career and technical education
teachers within a school from the prior school year, as
computed in accordance with guidelines prescribed by the
department, who are providing career and technical
education instruction in grades nine (9) through twelve
(12) and except as provided under W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxvii),
certified by the Wyoming professional teaching standards
board to provide instruction at the high school level for
career and technical education courses comprising career
HB0235

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0685
and technical education programs. Nothing in this
subsection shall require a district to employ teachers
certified for high school career and technical education
instruction on a full-time basis or to require teachers to
teach only high school career and technical education
courses on a full-time basis.

(c) Amounts awarded to each school district for
career and technical education supplies, materials and
equipment funding under this section shall be calculated as
the product of each school's FTE career and technical
education teachers reported under subsection (b) of this
section multiplied by fourteen thousand one hundred
eighty-four dollars and sixty-eight cents ($14,184.68). The
department shall further adjust the amount under this
subsection by any external cost adjustment enacted by the
legislature for the educational materials category of the
educational resource block grant model.

(d) Not later than October 15 of the applicable
school year and following review of applications submitted
under this section, the department shall notify applicant
districts of awards and shall provide each applicant
HB0235

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0685
district a written statement of the reasons for approving
or denying the application. Upon approval of applications,
the department shall pay each school district not later
than February 15 of the applicable school year.

(e) Each applicant district shall report to the
department on the expenditure of amounts awarded under this
section and shall provide other information as required by
rule of the department. Amounts awarded under this section
shall only be expended on supplies, materials and equipment
for career and technical education programs.

(f) The department of education shall promulgate
rules necessary to carry out this section.

(g) As used in this section, "career and technical
education program" shall be as specified in W.S.
21-13-309(m)(v)(D)(II).

Section 2. W.S. 21-12-105(b), 21-13-101(a)(v) and
(xvii) and 21-13-337(a) and (c) are amended to read:

HB0235

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0685
21-12-105. Career and technical education
demonstration project grants; application; criteria;
limitations.

(b) Any amount awarded to a district under this
section shall be in addition to and not be considered in
determining the school foundation program amount under the
education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S.
21-13-309 and the amount for career and technical education
supplies, materials and equipment pursuant to W.S.
21-13-338. A grant awarded under this section shall be for
a period of two (2) years and shall not exceed one hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) for the first year of
demonstration project planning, and not more than two
hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) for project
implementation in year two (2) of the project
grant. Thereafter, state assistance for the project shall
be limited to funds distributed to the district within its
foundation program amount as determined under the education
resource block grant model and the amount distributed under
W.S. 21-13-338. Any school district receiving funds under
W.S. 21-13-337 for career and technical supplies, materials
and equipment shall be ineligible to receive a grant under
HB0235

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0685
this section for the period the district receives funds
under W.S. 21-13-337.

21-13-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(v) "Foundation program" means the level of
funding which is to be made available to each district
under this article title so that each district is able to
comply with the state uniform educational program standards
imposed under W.S. 21-9-101 and 21-9-102 and the uniform
state student content and performance standards prescribed
by the state board of education under W.S.
21-2-304(a)(iii);

(xvii) "Attachment A" to 2011 House Bill 0127 as
amended by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99 2011
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 185, as further amended by
the legislature, consists of an enumeration of model
components as enacted into law, summarizing and executing
recommendations contained within the 2010 cost of education
HB0235

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0685
study, as modified by the legislature, and is hereby
incorporated into this chapter by this reference;

21-13-337. Career and technical education equipment
grants; application; criteria; limitations.

(a) A school district may apply to the state
department of education for state assistance to fund the
purchase of supplies, materials and equipment for a new or
existing career and technical education program in the
district. Amounts awarded under this section shall be in
addition to and shall not be considered in determining the
school foundation program amount under the education
resource block grant model pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309 and
shall be in addition to the amount for career and technical
education supplies, materials and equipment pursuant to
W.S. 21-13-338. Any school district receiving funds under
W.S. 21-12-105 for a career and technical education
demonstration project grant shall be ineligible to receive
funds under this section for the period the district
receives funds under W.S. 21-12-105.

HB0235

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0685
(c) Not later than August 15 of the applicable school
year and following review of applications submitted under
this section, the department shall notify applicant
districts of its grant awards and shall provide each
applicant district a written statement of the reasons for
approving or denying the application. No award shall be
given to a district unless it has expended, or will expend
with the award of the grant requested under this section,
the entire amount generated under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(D)
prior to school year 2025-2026 for supplies, materials and
equipment for career and technical education programs and
commencing school year 2025-2026, the entire amount
generated under W.S. 21-13-338 for supplies, materials and
equipment for career and technical education programs
utilizing expenditure data from the immediately preceding
five (5) school years from the date of application and
amounts from the special reserve fund created under W.S.
21-13-504 for supplies, materials and equipment for career
and technical education programs. Further Preference shall
be given to districts that have not received a grant under
this section in the immediately preceding five (5) school
years from the date of application. If an application is
approved, the department shall award the grant from amounts
HB0235

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0685
made available by legislative appropriation from the public
school foundation program account for purposes of this
section.

Section 3. 2011 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 185,
ATTACHMENT "A"(b)(xxv), as amended by 2017 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 205, Section 3 is amended to read:

ATTACHMENT "A"
ATTACHMENT "A" CONTAINS AN ENUMERATION OF
EDUCATION RESOURCE BLOCK GRANT MODEL COMPONENTS
SUMMARIZING AND EXECUTING RECOMMENDATIONS
CONTAINED IN THE 2010 COST OF EDUCATION STUDY AS
FOLLOWS:

(b) Notwithstanding components specified in
the 2010 cost of education study accepted by the
legislature, the Wyoming education resource block
grant model components and the resourcing for
those components, as enacted by the legislature,
shall be as follows:

HB0235

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0685
(xxv) Vocational Career and
technical education: 0.29
times
FTE vocational career and
technical education ADM.;

$9,428.77/FTE vocational
education teacher for
equipment and supplies.

Section 4. W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(D)(III) is repealed.

Section 5. 2011 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 185,
ATTACHMENT "A"(a)(iii)(D), as amended by 2012 Wyoming
Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section 3 is repealed.

Section 6. There is appropriated four million six
hundred forty thousand six hundred thirty-one dollars
($4,640,631.00) from the public school foundation program
account to the department of education-school finance for
career and technical education supplies, equipment and
replacement payments to school districts made necessary by
the amendments enacted in this act. This appropriation
HB0235

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0685
shall be for the period beginning July 1, 2025 and ending
June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2026. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
included in the standard budget for the department of
education-school finance for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

Section 7. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0235